lexc-files/prs-num/participial.txt
!=============================
LEXICON IntrPtcp
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive participial
!=============================
!------------------------|-----------------------------|----------------------------|
^[3Sg]:^0        Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^nga         Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^%{.m.%}ten Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^%{.m.%}t Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:%{.m.%}^kut  Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:%{.m.%}^si  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^%{.m.%}k Enclitic; ^[1Du]:%{.m.%}^kung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:%{.m.%}^tek Enclitic;
!------------------------|-----------------------------|----------------------------|

!===========================
LEXICON TrnsPtcp
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive participial
!===========================
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^nga        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^ngi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^q           Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^ngat       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^ngit       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^gket        Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^ngit       Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^ngik       Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^gket        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^gka        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^nka        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^gka         Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^vut        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^put        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^gput        Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^vung       Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^pung       Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^gpung       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^n          Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^ten        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^gken        Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^zi         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^si         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^gsi         Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^yek        Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^tek        Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^gtek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga    Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^vnga       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^fkut       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^pekung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^fsinga     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^pesikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^pesikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^petegnenga Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^petegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^petegnekung Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|

!============================
LEXICON IntrPtcpAlternate
!  a second participial mood?
!  ^[Jacobson (2001) p.73]
!============================
!-----------------|----------------------|---------------------|
^[3Sg]:^q Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^nga  Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^ten Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^t Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^kut  Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^si  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^k Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^kung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^tek Enclitic;
!-----------------|----------------------|---------------------|

!============================
LEXICON TrnsPtcpAlternate
!  a second participial mood?
!  ^[Jacobson (2001) p.73]
!============================
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^nga        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^ngi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^q           Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^ngat       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^ngit       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^gket        Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^ngit       Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^ngik       Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^gket        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^qa         Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^nka        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^ghqa         Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^vut        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^put        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^ghput        Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^vung       Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^pung       Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^gpung       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^n          Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^ten        Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^ghqen        Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^zi         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^si         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^ghsi         Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^yek        Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^tek        Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^ghtek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga    Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^inkut      Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^inkung      Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^vnga       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^fkut       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^pekung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^fsinga     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^pesikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^pesikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^petegnenga Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^petegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^petegnekung Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^isi        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^itek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
